Illinois, session 104th, SB1056.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Eastern Illinois Economic Development 5Authority Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 506/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Eastern Illinois Economic Development Authority Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-203, eff. 7-13-05.)